Missouri, session 2026, SB1489.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 195, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 195.1000, to read as
follows:
195.1000. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, ivermectin tablets and hydroxychloroquine
tablets shall be available to the public through over-the-
counter purchase in this state without a prescription or
consultation with a pharmacist or other health care
professional.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to
ensure the public has adequate access to ivermectin tablets
and hydroxychloroquine tablets, section A of this act is
deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby
declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of the
constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full
force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✓